
Company Profile for Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd



























































X



Edition:

India


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Profile: Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd (4361.T)





Related Topics: 
Stock QuotesBasic MaterialsCommodity Chemicals












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    










				4361.T on Tokyo Stock Exchange


				215JPY
3 Aug 2017





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    ¥1


					            (+0.47%)
					        






Prev Close

¥214


Open

¥216




Day's High

¥220


Day's Low

¥214




Volume

77,000


Avg. Vol

324,578




52-wk High

¥287


52-wk Low

¥101












					Full Description



		Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co., Ltd is primarily engaged in manufacturing rubber chemicals. The Company provides rubber chemicals such as vulcanization accelerators, vulcanizing agents and antioxidants, resin chemicals, including antioxidants and polymerization modifiers, intermediates of dyes and pigments, pharmaceuticals and agrochemicals, and other organic chemicals such as photographic chemicals, additives for lubricants, rust inhibitors, metal removing agents and other industrial chemicals. As of November 30, 2014, the Company had two subsidiaries.
» Full Overview of 4361.T







					Company Address



Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd
8F, Yamada Bldg., 2-8-4, UchikanCHIYODA-KU   TKY   101-0047
P: +8148.2225171







					Company Web Links



Home Page








					Officers & Directors






Name
Compensation




							 Yoshitaka Yamada

--




							 Tadashi Arai

--




							 Hideyuki Yamada

--




							 Mikio Ogino

--




							 Takashi Kayano

--




» More Officers & Directors





					Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd News




» More 4361.T  News
















Related Topics: 
Stock QuotesBasic MaterialsCommodity Chemicals
























Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd. - Japan Suppliers & Manufacturers












Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd.




 
Login | Join now |  Contact us | Help 





Home  |  Products  |  Suppliers  |  Buy  |  Sell  |  REACH  |  CAS  |  Resource







 ChemNet > Gold Suppliers > Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd. 
            
                

  
    












Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd. 





 Product more>> 


• 4,4'-Dithiodimorpholine  
• Chloranil  





 Contact Info    


 




Contact:
  
                        Sir  


Tel:  
048-222-8106  


Web site:

                        http://www.kawachem.co.jp


Add:
Japan, , 











Home

Products

About Us

Contact Info
 Search Product 











World Wide ChemNet: - International - China - U.S.E - urope - India - Japan - China(Taiwan) - Korea  - Trading Circle

About Us - Top Products- Partner with Us  - Contact Us - Help - Sitemap

ChemNet is a registered trademark of Zhejiang NetSun Co., Ltd. 












METHOD FOR PRODUCING CARBODIIMIDE - Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd.





































Login
                    
Sign up
                    









Search
                            





                                    Expert Search


                                    Quick Search








Patents/Apps
                                




                                    Non-Patent Literature
                                












SEARCH


                            RESEARCH



                            MPEP 2.0



                            TOOLS & RESOURCES
                        



                            ACCLAIM IP
                        


HELP






 

















Title:


                    METHOD FOR PRODUCING CARBODIIMIDE                





                European Patent EP2583971            

                Kind
                Code:
            

                B1            















Inventors:

                            Suzuki, Kenji c/o Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd.6-42 (Ryoke 4-chome, Kawaguchi-shi
Saitama 332-0004, JP)                
                            Kato, Tsukasa c/o Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd.6-42 (Ryoke 4-chome, Kawaguchi-shi
Saitama 332-0004, JP)                
                            Yamada, Tsutomu c/o Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd.6-42 (Ryoke 4-chome, Kawaguchi-shi
Saitama 332-0004, JP)                
                            Kamada, Yuya c/o Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd.6-42 (Ryoke 4-chome, Kawaguchi-shi
Saitama 332-0004, JP)                
                            Shoji, Shinichiro c/o Iwakuni Research CenterTeijin Limited2-1 (Hinodecho, Iwakuni-shi
Yamaguchi 740-0014, JP)                




Application Number:

            EP20110795860        



Publication Date:

            03/04/2015        



Filing Date:

            06/15/2011        



Export Citation:

 Click for automatic bibliography
                generation 




Assignee:

                            Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd. (8-4, Uchikanda 2-chome Chiyoda-ku, Tokyo 171-0047, JP)                
                            Teijin Limited (6-7, Minamihommachi 1-chome Chuo-ku, Osaka-shi, Osaka 541-0054, JP)                




International Classes:

C07D498/10; B01J31/02 





View Patent Images:

Download PDF EP2583971                 
                  PDF help









Foreign References:



WO/2008/081230A1MACROCYCLIC CARBODIIMIDE (MC-CDI) AND THEIR DERIVATIVES, SYNTHESES AND APPLICATIONS ON THE SAMEWO/2010/071211A1CYCLIC CARBODIIMIDE COMPOUNDSJP2004332166APOLYLACTIC ACID FIBERJP2005350829APOLYLACTIC ACID FIBER HAVING EXCELLENT HYDROLYTIC RESISTANCE 





Other References:

                            PEDRO MOLINA ET AL.: 'A New and Efficient Preparation of Cyclic Carbodiimides from Bis(iminophosphoranes) and the System Boc20/DMAP' JOURNAL OF ORGANIC CHEMISTRY vol. 59, 1994, pages 7306 - 7315                






Attorney, Agent or Firm:

                            Hallybone, Huw George (Carpmaels & Ransford LLP One Southampton Row, London WC1B 5HA, GB)                





Claims:

            1. A process for a production of a carbodiimide, comprising steps of:
(1) reacting an amine represented by the following formula (A) with carbon disulfide in the presence of a catalyst at a reaction temperature of 50 to 150°C to obtain a thiourea represented by the following formula (B):

wherein R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms;

wherein R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms;
(2) desulfurizing the obtained thiourea with a hypochlorite in the presence of a basic compound to obtain a carbodiimide represented by the following formula (C):

wherein R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms; and
(3) purifying the obtained carbodiimide,
wherein a phase transfer catalyst represented by the following formula (i) is further used in the step (2) :

wherein R1 to R4 are each independently a group selected from an alkyl group having 1 to 20 carbon atoms, an aryl group having 6 to 20 carbon atoms and an aralkyl group having 7 to 20 carbon atoms and A- is a halogen anion.                    
                    2. The production process according to claim 1, wherein the step (1) is carried out in the presence of a hydrogen sulfide capture agent.                    
                    3. The production process according to claim 1, wherein the step (1) is carried out in a sealed condition.                    
                    4. The production process according to claim 1, wherein the catalyst used in the step (1) is a compound having basicity with a pKa of its conjugate acid of 5 or more.                    
                    5. The production process according to claim 4, wherein the compound having basicity with a pKa of its conjugate acid of 5 or more is a substituted tertiary amine, a substituted imine, a substituted amide or a substituted heterocyclic ring.                    
                    6. The production process according to claim 1, wherein the hypochlorite used in the step (2) is sodium hypochlorite.                    
                    7. The production process according to claim 1, wherein the basic compound in the step (2) is sodium hydroxide, potassium hydroxide or a mixture thereof.                    
                    8. The production process according to claim 1, wherein the purification of the step (3) is recrystallization or extraction.                    
                    9. The production process according to claim 1 comprising the following steps before the step (1):
(α) reacting a compound represented by the following formula (a) with a compound represented by the following formula (b) in the presence of a phase transfer catalyst and an aqueous solution of an alkali metal hydroxide to obtain a nitro represented by the following formula (c):

wherein R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms and X is a halogen atom or a nitro group;


wherein R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms and
(β) reducing the obtained nitro represented by the formula (c) to obtain an amine represented by the following formula (A).

wherein R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms                    
                    10. The production process according to claim 9, wherein the phase transfer catalyst is a compound represented by the following formula (i):

(In the above formula (i), R1 to R4 are each independently a group selected from an alkyl group having 1 to 20 carbon atoms, an aryl group having 6 to 20 carbon atoms and an aralkyl group having 7 to 20 carbon atoms. A- is a halogen anion.)                    
                    11. The production process according to claim 9, wherein the phase transfer catalyst is at least one compound selected from the group consisting of tetraethylammonium salts, tetrabutylammonium salts, trioctylmethylammonium salts, benzyldimethyloctadecylammonium salts, benzyltriethylammonium salts, benzyltrimethylammonium salts and benzyltributylammonium salts.                    
                    12. The production process according to claim 9, wherein the aqueous solution of an alkali metal hydroxide is a sodium hydroxide aqueous solution or a potassium hydroxide aqueous solution.                    




Description:

TECHNICAL FIELDThe present invention relates to a process for the production of a carbodiimide and, more specifically, to a process for the production of a specific carbodiimide. BACKGROUND ARTIt is proposed that the concentration of carboxyl groups should be reduced by using a sealant for carboxyl groups since the hydrolysis of a compound having an ester bond such as a polyester is promoted by a polar group such as a carboxyl group (Patent Document 1, Patent Document 2). A carbodiimide compound is used as the sealant for carboxyl groups. However, as the carbodiimide compound is a linear compound, foul odors are produced from a volatile isocyanate compound which is formed as a by-product when the carbodiimide compound is used, thereby worsening the work environment. To cope with this, the applicant found a cyclic carbodiimide compound as a sealant which does not form an isocyanate compound as a by-product even when it reacts with a carboxyl group and filed an international patent application for this (Patent Document 3). A process for the production of cyclic carbodiimides was described (Non Patent Document 1). However, an industrial process for the production of this useful cyclic carbodiimide compound is not established yet.
(Patent Document 1) JP-A 2004-332166(Patent Document 2) JP-A 2005-350829(Patent Document 3) WO-A 2010/071211(Non Patent Document 1) Journal of Organic Chemistry 1994, 59, 7306-7315 DISCLOSURE OF THE INVENTION<production process of carbodiimide (C)>It is an object of the present invention to establish a technology for obtaining a high-purity carbodiimide from a specific amine through a thiourea efficiently by using an industrially applicable method. A general method used to obtain a thiourea (B) represented by the following formula (B) which is the precursor of a carbodiimide (C) represented by the following formula (C) is to react an amine (A) represented by the following formula (A) with carbon disulfide so as to remove hydrogen sulfide. However, in general, a reaction between an arylamine and carbon disulfide is very slow and has low yield. Further, since a large amount of a base is required and the reaction takes long, the above method has a problem with productivity. In addition, a large-scale removing apparatus for capturing hydrogen sulfide which is formed as a by-product in a stoichiometric amount is required. A general method used to obtain the carbodiimide (C) from the thiourea (B) is an oxidative desulfurization reaction from the thiourea (B). Although a simple method is to use mercury oxide or lead oxide, it has a great impact on the environment and cannot be used for industrial-scale production. A method in which sulfonyl chloride such as tosyl chloride or methanesulfonyl chloride is caused to act in a basic solvent such as pyridine is commonly used and applicable. However, pyridine is generally expensive and a recovery cycle is required for industrial-scale production but its recovery is difficult due to its compatibility with water and its azeotropic phenomenon. Sulfonyl chloride is also generally expensive. To synthesize a carbodiimide from a thiourea, a method in which a hypochlorite is caused to act is desired from an industrial point of view. However, there is no example in which it is applied to the thiourea (B). The inventors of the present invention conducted intensive studies to solve the above problems and found (a) a method for obtaining a thiourea from an amine, which can be applied industrially advantageously, (2) a method for obtaining a carbodiimide from a thiourea, which can be applied industrially advantageously, and (3) a method for purifying a carbodiimide. They found that a high-purity carbodiimide can be obtained efficiently by a combination of these methods as a method which allows for the industrial-scale production of the carbodiimide.
That is, it is an object of the present invention to provide:
1. A process for a production of a carbodiimide, comprising steps of:
(1) reacting an amine represented by the following formula (A) with carbon disulfide in the presence of a catalyst at a reaction temperature of 50 to 150°C to obtain a thiourea represented by the following formula (B):

wherein R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms;

wherein R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms;(2) desulfurizing the obtained thiourea with a hypochlorite in the presence of a basic compound to obtain a carbodiimide represented by the following formula (C) :

wherein R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms; and(3) purifying the obtained carbodiimide,
wherein a phase transfer catalyst represented by the following formula (i) is further used in the step (2):

wherein R1 to R4 are each independently a group selected from an alkyl group having 1 to 20 carbon atoms, an aryl group having 6 to 20 carbon atoms and an aralkyl group having 7 to 20 carbon atoms and A- is a halogen anion.

The invention of the present application also includes the following inventions.
2. The production process in the above paragraph 1, wherein the step (1) is carried out in the presence of a hydrogen sulfide capture agent.3. The production process in the above paragraph 1, wherein the step (1) is carried out in a sealed condition.4. The production process in the above paragraph 1, wherein the catalyst used in the step (1) is a compound having basicity with a pKa of its conjugate acid of 5 or more.5. The production process in the above paragraph 4, wherein the compound having basicity with a pKa of its conjugate acid of 5 or more is a substituted tertiary amine, a substituted imine, a substituted amide or a substituted heterocyclic ring.6. The production process in the above paragraph 1, wherein the hypochlorite used in the step (2) is sodium hypochlorite.7. The production process in the above paragraph 1, wherein the basic compound in the step (2) is sodium hydroxide, potassium hydroxide or a mixture thereof.8. The production process in the above paragraph 1, wherein the purification of the step (3) is recrystallization or extraction. <production process of amine represented by formula (A)>It is another object of the present invention to provide a process for obtaining an amine, comprising the steps of:
reacting a compound represented by the following formula (a) with a compound represented by the following formula (b) to obtain a nitro represented by the following formula (c); andreducing the nitro.Especially, when the nitro represented by the formula (c) is synthesized, a method which can be applied industrially advantageously is used to improve the reaction yield.

(In the above formula (a), R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms. X is a halogen atom or a nitro group.)


(In the above formula (c), R is as defined in the above formula (a).) As a general method used to obtain the compound (c), a method in which an elimination group is introduced into the compound (b) to be reacted with substituted-o-nitrophenol or a method in which the compound (b) is reacted with substituted-o-halonitrobenzene can be employed. Although the latter method is particularly useful, a method in which a solid basic compound is caused to act in an aprotic polar solvent is generally used. The aprotic polar solvent is typified by N,N-dimethylformamide, N-methylpyrrolidone and dimethyl sulfoxide. They are generally expensive and require a recovery cycle for industrial-scale production. However, since they have compatibility with water and high boiling point, it is difficult to recover them and a huge amount of energy is required. The solid basic compound is generally typified by potassium carbonate, sodium hydride, sodium hydroxide and potassium hydroxide, and attention must be paid to its deliquescent property, an explosion hazard caused by the production of hydrogen and the handling of strong alkaline dust in many cases. The inventors studied the means of improving the reaction yield by employing an industrially advantageous method when the nitro represented by the formula (c) is synthesized by reacting the compound represented by the formula (a) with the compound represented by the formula (b). As a result, they found that a nitro having high purity can be produced at a high yield without using an aprotic polar solvent when a specific catalyst and an aqueous solution of an alkaline metal hydroxide are made existent during a reaction. The present invention was accomplished based on this finding. That is, before the step (1), the process of the present invention preferably comprises the steps of:
(α) reacting a compound represented by the following formula (a) with a compound represented by the following formula (b) in the presence of a phase transfer catalyst and an aqueous solution of an alkali metal hydroxide to obtain a nitro represented by the following formula (c):

(In the above formula (a), R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms. X is a halogen atom or a nitro group.)


(In the above formula (c), R is as defined in the above formula (a).); and(β) reducing the obtained nitro represented by the formula (c) to obtain an amine represented by the following formula (A) :

(In the above formula (A), R is as defined in the above formula (a.).
11. The phase transfer catalyst is preferably a compound represented by the following formula (i).

(In the above formula (i), R1 to R4 are each independently a group selected from an alkyl group having 1 to 20 carbon atoms, an aryl group having 6 to 20 carbon atoms and an aralkyl group having 7 to 20 carbon atoms. A- is a halogen anion.)12. The phase transfer catalyst is at least one compound selected from the group consisting of tetraethylammonium salts, tetrabutylammonium salts, trioctylmethylammonium salts, benzyldimethyloctadecylammonium salts, benzyltriethylammonium salts, benzyltrimethylammonium salts and benzyltributylammonium salts.13. The aqueous solution of an alkaline metal hydroxide is preferably a sodium hydroxide aqueous solution or a potassium hydroxide aqueous solution. BEST MODE FOR CARRYING OUT THE INVENTION<production process of carbodiimide>The production process of the carbodiimide of the present invention comprises the steps (1), (2) and (3). [step (1)]The step (1) is to react an amine represented by the following formula (A) with carbon disulfide at a reaction temperature of 50 to 150 °C in the presence of a catalyst to obtain a thiourea represented by the following formula (B). The amine is represented by the following formula (A).
 In the above formula (A), R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms. Examples of the alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms include methyl group, ethyl group, n-propyl group, sec-propyl group, iso-propyl group, n-butyl group, tert-butyl group, sec-butyl group, iso-butyl group, n-pentyl group, sec-pentyl group, iso-pentyl group, n-hexyl group, sec-hexyl group and iso-hexyl group. The catalyst is preferably a compound having basicity with a pKa of its conjugate acid of 5 or more. The compound is selected from a substituted tertiary amine, a substituted alkanolamine, a substituted imine, a substituted amide and a substituted heterocyclic ring. Specific examples thereof include triethylamine, N-methylpyrrolidone, N-methylmorpholine, tetramethylethylenediamine, dimethylethanolamine, diethylethanolamine, ethyldiethanolamine, butyldiethanolamine, triethanolamine, imidazole, N-methyl-2-mercaptoimidazole, pyridine, 4-dimethylaminopyridine, 'tetramethylguanidine, 1,8-diazabicyclo[5.4.0]undec-7-ene and 1,4-diazabicyclo[2.2.2]octane. The amount of the catalyst is preferably 0.1 to 5 moles, more preferably 0.3 to 3 moles based on 1 mole of the amine. The amount of carbon disulfide is preferably 2 to 8 moles, more preferably 3 to 6 moles based on 1 mole of the amine. The reaction is preferably carried out under a sealed condition. The reaction temperature is 50 to 150°C, preferably 80 to 130°C. By carrying out the reaction under a sealed condition, the reaction system can be heated without being affected by low-boiling point carbon disulfide and the reaction can be promoted quickly. The reaction time is 3 to 20 hours preferably 5 to 15 hours. The reaction is preferably carried out in the presence of a hydrogen sulfide capture agent. The hydrogen sulfide capture agent means a compound which can react with hydrogen sulfide, as exemplified by alkyl halides, acid anhydrides and multiply-bonded compounds. Multiply-bonded compounds are preferred when the odors of by-product acid and mercaptan and reactivity with a raw material amine are taken into consideration. Nitrile compounds may be preferably used, out of which acetonitrile and benzonitrile are used and may also be used as a solvent. After the end of the reaction, excessive carbon disulfide is contained. Although it may not be removed, its concentration and removal before filtration are preferred from the viewpoint of safety. A solvent may be added thereafter. The recovered carbon disulfide can be recycled to the production system. In the step (1), the amount of the basic compound may be the amount of a catalyst, a thiourea of interest can be obtained in a short time, and most of the desorbed hydrogen sulfide is captured by a capture agent and not discharged to the outside of the system, whereby a large-scale apparatus for removing hydrogen sulfide is not necessary. When a preferably used nitrile is used as the capture agent, after its reaction with hydrogen sulfide, it becomes a thioamide which is chemically neutral and stable, thereby making a treatment after that simple. The thiourea obtained in the step (1) is represented by the following formula (B).
 In the formula (B), R is as defined in the above formula (A). [step (2)]The step (2) is to desulfurize the obtained thiourea with a hypochlorite in the presence of a basic compound to obtain a carbodiimide represented by the following formula (C). As the basic compound is used sodium hydroxide, potassium hydroxide or a mixture thereof. It may be added continuously or in fractional amounts. The amount of the basic compound is preferably 0.3 to 6 equivalents, more preferably 0.5 to 4 equivalents based on the thiourea. The basic compound is preferably in the form of an aqueous solution. The concentration of the aqueous solution is preferably 60 to 10 wt%, more preferably 50 to 20 wt% which is easily industrially acquired. An example of the hypochlorite is sodium hydrochlorite. The amount of the hypochlorite is preferably 2 to 10 equivalents, more preferably 3 to 5 equivalents based on the thiourea. The hypochlorite is preferably in the form of an aqueous solution. The concentration of the aqueous solution is preferably 15 to 10 wt% which is easily industrially acquired. The reaction is preferably carried out in an organic solvent. An organic solvent which is separated from water is preferably used, as exemplified by chloroform, toluene, chlorobenzene and xylene. The amount of the organic solvent is preferably 2 to 15 times, more preferably 3 to 8 times the weight of the thiourea. These solvents may be used alone but a polar solvent such as methanol, ethanol, isopropanol or propanol may be added to promote the reaction smoothly. In the step (2), a phase transfer catalyst is preferably used to promote the reaction smoothly. As the phase transfer catalyst may be used an ordinary quaternary ammonium salt. A compound represented by the following formula (i) is preferably used as the phase transfer catalyst.
 In the formula (i), R1 to R4 are each independently a group selected from an alkyl group having 1 to 20 carbon atoms, an aryl group having 6 to 20 carbon atoms and an aralkyl group having 7 to 20 carbon atoms. A- is a halogen anion. Examples of the alkyl group having 1 to 20 carbon atoms include methyl group, ethyl group, propyl group, butyl group, pentyl group, hexyl group, heptyl group, octyl group, nonyl group, decyl group, undecyl group, dodecyl group, tridecyl group, tetradecyl group, pentadecyl group, hexadecyl group, octadecyl group and nonadecyl group. Examples of the aryl group having 6 to 20 carbon atoms include phenyl group and naphthyl group. They may be substituted by an alkyl group having 1 to 10 carbon atoms. Examples of the alkyl group having 1 to 10 carbon atoms as a substituent include methyl group, ethyl group, propyl group, butyl group, pentyl group, hexyl group, heptyl group, octyl group, nonyl group and decyl group. Examples of the aralkyl group having 7 to 20 carbon atoms include benzyl group, phenethyl group, methylbenzyl group and diphenylmethyl group. Examples of the halogen anion A- include fluorine ion, chlorine ion and bromine ion. Examples of the phase transfer catalyst include tetraethylammonium salts, tetrabutylammonium salts, trioctylmethylammonium salts, benzyldimethyloctadecylammonium salts, benzyltriethylammonium salts, benzyltrimethylammonium salts and benzyltributylammonium salts. They may be used alone or in combination of two or more. A quaternary ammonium salt may be used as the phase transfer catalyst. The amount of the phase transfer catalyst is 0.01 to 0.2 times, more preferably 0.03 to 0.1 time the weight of the thiourea. The carbodiimide obtained in the step (2) is represented by the following formula (C).
 In the formula (C), R is as defined in the above formula (A). After the end of the reaction, the organic solvent may be concentrated and replaced by a new organic solvent so as to improve the yield and quality of the compound C. That is, this step may include the subsequent step (3). As a matter of course, the method of synthesizing this carbodiimide, that is, the step (2) can be applied to the thiourea synthesized without the step (1). [step (3)]The step (3) is to purify the obtained carbodiimide. Sulfur is contained in the carbodiimide obtained from the thiourea in many cases. The color tone and purity of the carbodiimide are improved by purification. Purification is preferably recrystallization or extraction. Purification is carried out by heating the carbodiimide in an organic solvent to extract unwanted substances including a coloring component, cooling, filtering and washing it. Any organic solvent may be acceptable if it has solubility for sulfur in a minute amount and is selected from aromatic hydrocarbons, hydrogen carbide, ethers, ketones, esters, alcohols and halogen-containing solvents. Specific examples of the organic solvent include toluene, xylene, chlorobenzene, dichlorobenzene, chlorotoluene, hexane, heptane, cyclohexane, tetrahydrofuran, acetone, methyl ethyl ketone, ethyl acetate, methanol, ethanol, dichloromethane and chloroform. Toluene, xylene, chlorobenzene, tetrahydrofuran and chloroform are preferably used from the viewpoints of the amount of the solvent, a depigmentation effect, the removal rate of sulfur and the recovery rate of the carbodiimide. The amount of the organic solvent is preferably 2 to 50 times, more preferably 3 to 15 times the weight of the carbodiimide. After heating, the organic solvent used to increase the recovery rate of the carbodiimide may be concentrated and recovered. As a matter of course, the purity and color of even a carbodiimide synthesized without the steps (2) and (3) are improved by the process of the present invention. The process of the present invention is particularly effective for the purification of a carbodiimide synthesized through a thiourea. <production of amine represented by formula (A)>The amine represented by the formula (A) can be produced by the following steps:
(α) reacting a compound represented by the following formula (a) with a compound represented by the following formula (b) in the presence of a phase transfer catalyst and an aqueous solution of an alkali metal hydroxide to obtain a nitro represented by the following formula (c); and(β) reducing the obtained nitro represented by the formula (c) to obtain an amine represented by the formula (A). [step (α)]The compound (a) is represented by the following formula.
 In the formula (a), R is a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms. X is a halogen atom or a nitro group. Examples of the alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms include methyl group, ethyl group, n-propyl group, sec-propyl group, iso-propyl group, n-butyl group, tert-butyl group, sec-butyl group, iso-butyl group, n-pentyl group, sec-pentyl group, iso-pentyl group, n-hexyl group, sec-hexyl group and iso-hexyl group. Examples of the halogen atom include chlorine atom, bromine atom and iodine atom. As the compound (a) is preferably used o-chloronitrobenzene, o-fluoronitrobenzene or o-dinitrobenzene. They may be substituted. The amount of the compound (a) is preferably 4 to 8 equivalents, more preferably 4 to 6 equivalents based on the compound (b). The compound (b) is pentaerythritol represented by the following formula.
 The nitro is represented by the following formula (c) .
 In the formula (c), R is as defined in the formula (a), that is, a hydrogen atom or an alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms. Examples of the alkyl group having 1 to 6 carbon atoms include methyl group, ethyl group, n-propyl group, sec-propyl group, iso-propyl group, n-butyl group, tert-butyl group, sec-butyl group, iso-butyl group, n-pentyl group, sec-pentyl group, iso-pentyl group, n-hexyl group, sec-hexyl group and iso-hexyl group. The characteristic feature of the step (α) is that the above compound (a) is reacted with the compound (b) in the presence of a phase transfer catalyst and an aqueous solution of an alkali metal hydroxide. The phase transfer catalyst in the step (α) is preferably a compound represented by the following formula (i).
 In the formula (i), R1 to R4 are each independently a group selected from an alkyl group having 1 to 20 carbon atoms, an aryl group having 6 to 20 carbon atoms and an aralkyl group having 7 to 20 carbon atoms. A- is a halogen anion. Examples of the alkyl group having 1 to 20 carbon atoms include methyl group, ethyl group, propyl group, butyl group, pentyl group, hexyl group, heptyl group, octyl group, nonyl group, decyl group, undecyl group, dodecyl group, tridecyl group, tetradecyl group, pentadecyl group, hexadecyl group, octadecyl group and nonadecyl group. Examples of the aryl group having 6 to 20 carbon atoms include phenyl group and naphthyl group. They may be substituted by an alkyl group having 1 to 10 carbon atoms. Examples of the alkyl group having 1 to 10 carbon atoms as a substituent include methyl group, ethyl group, propyl group, butyl group, pentyl group, hexyl group, heptyl group, octyl group, nonyl group and decyl group. Examples of the aralkyl group having 7 to 20 carbon atoms include benzyl group, phenethyl group, methylbenzyl group and diphenylmethyl group. Examples of the halogen anion A- include fluorine ion, chlorine ion and bromine ion. Examples of the phase transfer catalyst include tetraethylammonium salts, tetrabutylammonium salts, trioctylmethylammonium salts, benzyldimethyloctadecylammonium salts, benzyltriethylammonium salts, benzyltrimethylammonium salts and benzyltributylammonium salts. They may be used alone or in combination of two or more. A quaternary ammonium salt may be used as the phase transfer catalyst. The amount of the phase transfer catalyst may be 0.1 to 5 equivalents based on the compound (b). Examples of the alkali metal include sodium and potassium. As the aqueous solution of an alkali metal hydroxide may be preferably used a sodium hydroxide aqueous solution and a potassium hydroxide aqueous solution. The concentration of the aqueous solution is preferably 60 to 20 wt%, more preferably 48 to 30 wt% which can be industrially acquired. The aqueous solution of an alkali metal hydroxide is preferably a sodium hydroxide aqueous solution or a potassium hydroxide aqueous solution. The aqueous solution of the alkali metal hydroxide may be added continuously or in fractional amounts. The amount of the aqueous solution of the alkali metal hydroxide is preferably 4 to 15 equivalents, preferably 4.5 to 10 equivalents based on the compound (b) as an alkali metal hydroxide when the proceeding and economic efficiency of the reaction are taken into consideration. The aqueous solution of the alkali metal hydroxide is easy to handle and inexpensive as compared with a solid basic compound such as potassium carbonate, sodium hydride, sodium hydroxide or potassium hydroxide. Although a small amount of the organic solvent may be added to the reaction system from the viewpoints of the sublimation and melting point of the compound (a), as a matter of course, the reaction can be carried out without a solvent. After the end of the reaction, the reaction solution has strong alkalinity and may or may not be neutralized with an acid. Washing after filtration is preferably carried out with water so as to wash away water-soluble impurities. Thereafter, an organic solvent, especially toluene or methanol which is often used in the industrial field can be used to wash away impurities such as raw materials. These organic solvents can be recycled to the production system. Since an expensive aprotic polar solvent is not used in this reaction system, the recovery of the solvent is naturally unnecessary, and the amine can be produced industrially advantageously. [step (β)]The step (β) is to reduce the obtained nitro represented by the formula (c) so as to obtain an amine represented by the formula (A). The reaction can be carried out by using a conventionally known method. For example, the nitro (c) is contact reduced in a solvent in the presence of hydrogen and a catalyst. Examples of the catalyst include palladium carbon, palladium carbon-ethylenediamine complex, palladium-fibroin, palladium-polyethyleneimine, nickel and copper. Examples of the solvent include methanol, ethanol, isopropyl alcohol, dioxane, tetrahydrofuran, ethyl acetate, dichloromethane, chloroform and N,N-dimethylformamide. The reaction temperature is preferably 25 to 100 °C. Although the reaction proceeds at normal pressure, pressure is preferably applied to promote the reaction. Alternatively, a method in which the nitro (c) is reacted with an acid and a metal or a method in which the nitro (c) is reacted with hydrazine and a catalyst may be employed to obtain the amine (A). Examples<production process of carbodiimide>The production process of the carbodiimide (C) will be described in detail hereinunder. Values were obtained by the following methods.
(1) Identification of compound:
The identification of each compound was carried out by means of the GCMS-QP5000 mass analyzer of Shimadzu Corporation.(2) Yield, yield rate:
The yields and yield rates of the synthesized intermediate and the final product were calculated based on the raw material amine in the case of a thiourea, based on the raw material thiourea in the case of a carbodiimide and based on a carbodiimide before purification in the case of a purified carbodiimide.(3) LC purity:
LC purity indicates the area percent of each compound based on 100 % of the total area value of peaks excluding the solvent by confirming with analysis using high-speed liquid chromatography.(4) Sulfur content:
This was measured by using high-speed liquid chromatography.(5) Color tone:
The color tone was measured with a color difference meter by grinding a specimen.
Color difference meter: Spectro Color Meter SE2000 of Nippon Denshoku Industries Co., Ltd. Example 1[step (1)]100.0 g (0.2 mole) of an amine (A1) of the formula (A) in which R is a hydrogen atom (manufactured by Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co., Ltd. : LC purity of 96 %), 91. 2 g (1.2 moles) of carbon disulfide, 8.96 g (0.1 mole) of dimethylethanolamine and 450 ml of acetonitrile were added to an SUS autoclave which was then sealed up. Thereafter, a reaction was carried out at 100°C for 15 hours under agitation. After cooling, the pressure was relieved, and excessive carbon disulfide was collected. Thereafter, 100 ml of acetonitrile was added, the resulting mixture was filtered, and the filtrate was washed with 500 ml of acetonitrile. After drying, a thiourea (B1) of the formula (B) in which R is a hydrogen atom was obtained. (yield: 107. 6 g/yield rate: 92.0 %/LC purity: 97.8 %) [step (2)]50.0 g (0.086 mole) of the obtained thiourea (B1), 1,200 g of chloroform, 40 g of methanol, 13.2 g (0.1 mole) of a 30 % sodium hydroxide aqueous solution and 3.0 g of benzyltriethylammonium chloride were fed. 165.6 g (0.31 mole) of a 13.9 % sodium hypochlorite aqueous solution was added dropwise to the obtained product over 50 minutes to ensure that the inside temperature of the reactor did not exceed 40°C. After 1 hour of agitation, 50.0 g of the thiourea (B1) and 13.2 g of a 30 % sodium hydroxide aqueous solution were injected again. 165.6 g of a 13.9 % sodium hypochlorite aqueous solution was added dropwise at a reactor inside temperature of 25 to 40°C over 50 minutes. After 3.5 hours of agitation at 30 to 40°C, chloroform was distilled off under reduced pressure, and 300 g of toluene was added. The content was filtered, and the filtrate was washed with 200 g of water, 100 g of toluene and 160 g of acetone sequentially. After drying, a carbodiimide (C1) of the formula (C) in which R is a hydrogen atom was obtained. (yield: 73.3 g/yield rate: 82.9 %/LC purity: 99.0 %/sulfur content: 394 ppm) (color tone: Lab/YI: 86.65, 2.00, 10.38/23.31) [step (3)]5.00 g of the obtained carbodiimide (C1) and 15 ml of toluene were fed and refluxed for 3 hours. After cooling, the obtained product was filtered, and the filtrate was washed with 10 ml of acetone. After drying, a purified carbodiimide (C1) of the formula (C) in which R is a hydrogen atom was obtained. (yield: 4.75 g/yield rate: 95.0 %). At this point, the sulfur content was reduced to 123 ppm, and the LC purity was 99.3 %. (color tone: Lab/YI: 90.50, -0.19, 6.96/13.83) Example 2A purified carbodiimide (C1) was obtained in the same manner as in Example 1 except that the carbodiimide (C1) of the formula (C) in which R is a hydrogen atom, obtained from the steps (1) and (2), was used and toluene in the step (3) was changed to tetrahydrofuran. (yield: 4.50 g/yield rate: 90.0 %). At this point, the sulfur content was reduced to 73 ppm and the LC purity was 99.9 %. (color tone: Lab/YI: 91.83, 0.09, 7.30/14.51) Example 3A purified carbodiimide (C1) was obtained in the same manner as in Example 1 except that the carbodiimide (C1) of the formula (C) in which R is a hydrogen atom, obtained from the steps (1) and (2), was used and toluene in the step (3) was changed to chloroform. (yield: 4.66 g/yield rate: 93.2 %). At this point, the sulfur content was reduced to 216 ppm and the LC purity was 99.3 %. (color tone: Lab/YI: 91.45, 0.15, 8.20/16.38) Example 4A purified carbodiimide (C1) was obtained in the same manner as in Example 1 except that the carbodiimide (C1) of the formula (C) in which R is a hydrogen atom, obtained from the steps (1) and (2), was used and toluene in the step (3) was changed to 20 ml of methyl ethyl ketone. (yield: 4.71 g/yield rate: 94.2 %). At this point, the sulfur content was reduced to 223 ppm and the LC purity was 99.3 %. (color tone: Lab/YI: 91.47, 0.42, 8.42/17.03) Example 55.00 g of the carbodiimide (C1) of the formula (C) in which R is a hydrogen atom, obtained from the steps (1) and (2) in Example 1, and 75 ml of toluene were fed and refluxed for 1 hour. Thereafter, 40 ml of toluene was concentrated. After cooling, the obtained product was filtered and the filtrate was washed with 10 ml of acetone. After drying, a purified carbodiimide (C1) of the formula (C) in which R is a hydrogen atom was obtained. (yield: 4.70 g/yield rate: 94.0 %). At this point, the sulfur content was reduced to 9 ppm and the LC purity was 99.5 %. Example 6[step (1)]40.0 g (0.08 mole) of an amine (A1) of the formula (A) in which R is a hydrogen atom (manufactured by Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co., Ltd.: LC purity of 96 %), 36.6 g (0.48 mole) of carbon disulfide, 10.9 g (0.16 mole) of imidazole and 120 ml of acetonitrile were added to an SUS autoclave which was then sealed up. Thereafter, a reaction was carried out at 100°C for 15 hours under agitation. After cooling, the pressure was relieved, and excessive carbon disulfide was collected by distillation. Thereafter, 50 ml of acetonitrile was added, the resulting mixture was filtered, and the filtrate was washed with 200 ml of acetonitrile. A thiourea (B1) of the formula (B) in which R is a hydrogen atom was obtained. (yield before drying: 47. 6 g/yield rate: 101.8 %/LC purity: 97.6 %) [step (2)]9.0 g (pure content of 0.013 mole) of the obtained undried thiourea (B1), 90 g of chloroform, 3 g of methanol, 2. 0 g (0. 015 mole) of a 30 % sodium hydroxide aqueous solution and 0.45 g of benzyltriethylammonium chloride were fed. 25.1 g (0.047 mole) of a 13.9 % sodium hypochlorite aqueous solution was added dropwise to the obtained product over 25 minutes to ensure that the inside temperature of the reactor did not exceed 40°C. After 1 hour of agitation, 9.0 g of the obtained thiourea (B1) before drying and 2.0 g of a 30 % sodium hydroxide aqueous solution were injected again. 25.1 g of a 13.9 % sodium hypochlorite aqueous solution was added dropwise at a reactor inside temperature of 25 to 40°C over 15 minutes. After 4 hours of agitation at 30 to 40°C, chloroform was distilled off under reduced pressure and 45 g of toluene was added. The content was filtered and the filtrate was washed with 30 g of water, 15 g of toluene and 25 g of acetone sequentially. After drying, a carbodiimide (C1) of the formula (C) in which R is a hydrogen atom was obtained. (yield: 11.8 g/yield rate: 88.7 %/ LC purity: 98.8 %/sulfur content: 1018 ppm) [step (3)]5.00 g of the obtained carbodiimide (C1) and 50 ml of toluene were fed and refluxed for 3 hours. After cooling, the obtained product was filtered and the filtrate was washed with 10 ml of acetone. After drying, a purified carbodiimide (C1) of the formula (C) in which R is a hydrogen atom was obtained. (yield: 4.53 g/yield rate: 90.6%). At this point, the sulfur content was reduced to 47 ppm and the LC purity was 99.4 %. <production of amine represented by formula (A)>The production process of the amine represented by the formula (A) will be described hereinunder. Values were obtained by the following methods.
(1) Identification of compound:
The identification of each compound was carried out by means of the JNR-EX270 NMR of JEOL Ltd. and the GCMS-QP5000 mass analyzer of Shimadzu Corporation.(2) Yield, yield rate:
The yield and yield rate of the synthesized nitro were calculated based on the compound (b).(3) LC purity:
The LC purity indicates the area percent of the compound (c) based on 100 % of the total area value of peaks excluding the solvent and the raw material compound (a) by confirming with analysis using high-speed liquid chromatography.(4) Selectivity:
The selectivity is represented by area value of tetranitro/(area value of tetranitro + area value of trinitromonohalogen) x 100 The area values of the tetranitro and the trinitromonohalogen were obtained by analysis using high-speed liquid chromatography. Synthesis Example 1[step (α)]4.08 g of pentaerythritol, 23.63 g of o-chloronitrobenzene, 4 ml of toluene and 6.83 g of benzyltriethylammonium chloride were fed to a glass reactor, and 31.56 g of a 48 % potassium hydroxide aqueous solution was added to the reactor at 70 to 85°C over 5 hours. Thereafter, a reaction was carried out at the same temperature for 20 hours. After cooling, 50 g of water was added to the reaction product, and the resulting product was neutralized with hydrochloric acid. Thereafter, the obtained product was filtered, and the filtrate was washed with 60 g of water and 90 ml of methanol sequentially and dried to obtain a nitro (c). (yield: 17.90 g/yield rate: 96.2 %/LC purity: 96.7 %/selectivity: 97.7%). The obtained nitro (c) had a high yield rate and high purity. [step (β)]Then, the nitro (c) (0.1 mole), 5 % palladium carbon (Pd/C) (2 g) and 400 ml of ethanol/dichloromethane (70/30) were fed to a reactor equipped with a stirrer, the inside of the reactor was substituted by hydrogen 5 times, and a reaction was carried out while hydrogen was always supplied at 25°C and terminated when the amount of hydrogen did not decrease any more. When Pd/C was collected and the mixed solvent was removed, an amine (A) was obtained. Synthesis Example 2[step (α)]4.08 g of pentaerythritol, 23.63 g of o-chloronitrobenzene, 4 ml of toluene, 4.5 g of water and 6.96 g of tetrabutylammonium bromide were fed to a glass reactor, and 22. 5 g of a 48 % sodium hydroxide aqueous solution was added to the reactor at 80 to 84°C over 4 hours and 40 minutes. Thereafter, a reaction was carried out at the same temperature for 22 hours. After cooling, 40 g of water and 4 ml of toluene were added to the reaction product, and the resulting product was neutralized with hydrochloric acid. Thereafter, the obtained product was filtered, and the filtrate was washed with 40 g of water and 60 ml of methanol sequentially and dried to obtain a nitro (c). (yield: 17.89 g/yield rate: 96.1 %/LC purity: 95.9 %/selectivity: 96.4 %). The obtained nitro (c) had a high yield rate and high purity. [step (β)]Then, the nitro (c) (0.1 mole), 5 % palladium carbon (Pd/C) (2 g) and 400 ml of ethanol/dichloromethane (70/30) were fed to a reactor equipped with a stirrer, the inside of the reactor was substituted by hydrogen 5 times, and a reaction was carried out while hydrogen was always supplied at 25°C and terminated when the amount of hydrogen did not decrease any more. When Pd/C was collected and the mixed solvent was removed, an amine (A) was obtained. Synthesis Example 3[step (α)]1.36 g of pentaerythritol, 6.77 g of o-fluoronitrobenzene, 2.5 ml of toluene, 0.77 g of tetrabutylammonium bromide and 9.35 g of 48 % potassium hydroxide were fed to a glass reactor to carry out a reaction at 70°C for 18 hours. After cooling, the reaction product was neutralized with concentrated hydrochloric acid and then 7.5 ml of toluene was added. Thereafter, the obtained product was filtered, and the filtrate was washed with 20 ml of water and 60 ml of methanol and dried to obtain a nitro (c). (yield: 6.18 g/yield rate: 99.6 %/LC purity: 99.9 %/selectivity: 100 %). The obtained nitro (c) had a high yield rate and high purity. [step (β)]Then, the nitro (c) (0.1 mole), 5 % palladium carbon (Pd/C) (2 g) and 400 ml of ethanol/dichloromethane (70/30) were fed to a reactor equipped with a stirrer, the inside of the reactor was substituted by hydrogen 5 times, and a reaction was carried out while hydrogen was always supplied at 25°C and terminated when the amount of hydrogen did not decrease any more. When Pd/C was collected and the mixed solvent was removed, an amine (A) was obtained. Synthesis Example 4[step (α)]0. 68 g of pentaerythritol, 4.20 g of o-dinitrobenzene, 3 ml of toluene, 0.38 g of tetrabutylammonium bromide and 3.33 g of sodium hydroxide were fed to a glass reactor to carry out a reaction at 55°C for 20 hours. After cooling, 10 g of water was added to the reaction product, and the resulting product was neutralized with concentrated hydrochloric acid. Thereafter, the obtained product was filtered, and the filtrate was washed with 20 ml g of water and 30 ml of methanol and dried to obtain a nitro (c). (yield: 2.80 g/yield rate: 90.2 %/LC purity: 99.8 %). The obtained nitro (c) had a high yield rate and high purity. [step (β)]Then, the nitro (c) (0.1 mole), 5 % palladium carbon (Pd/C) (2 g) and 400 ml of ethanol/dichloromethane (70/30) were fed to a reactor equipped with a stirrer, the inside of the reactor was substituted by hydrogen 5 times, and a reaction was carried out while hydrogen was always supplied at 25°C and terminated when the amount of hydrogen did not decrease any more. When Pd/C was collected and the mixed solvent was removed, an amine (A) was obtained. Reference Example (no addition of phase transfer catalyst)0.68 g of pentaerythritol, 3.94 g of o-chloronitrobenzene, 5 ml of toluene and 4.0 g of 30 % sodium hydroxide were fed to a glass reactor and reacted under reflux for 24 hours. The compound (c) of interest was not obtained at all. Comparative Synthesis Example1.36 g of pentaerythritol, 6.61 g of o-chloronitrobenzene, 13 g of N, N-dimethylacetamide and 2.0 g of solid sodium hydroxide were fed to a glass reactor to carry out a reaction at 60°C for 23 hours. After cooling, 20 g of water was added to the reaction product, the supernatant solution was discarded, and 30 ml of methanol was added to disperse crystals. After filtration, the filtrate was washed with 30 ml of water and 30 ml of methanol and dried to obtain a nitro (c). (yield: 4.51 g/yield rate: 72.7 %/LC purity: 77.4 %/selectivity: 95.2 %). The obtained nitro (c) had a low yield rate and low purity. Effect of the InventionAccording to the production process of the present invention, a high-purity carbodiimide which is useful as an end-sealing agent for polyesters can be produced efficiently. According to the production process of the present invention, a specific nitro which is useful as an intermediate for a cyclic carbodiimide compound can be produced at a high yield. 





<- Previous Patent (Certain chemical ent...)   |   Next Patent (THERAPEUTIC AGENT FO...) ->










Home


Search


Services


Communities


Help


Contact us

Advertise on this Site










            © 2004-2017 FreePatentsOnline.com. All rights reserved.
            Privacy Policy
                & Terms of Use.
A SumoBrain Solutions Company


 













Guanythiourea | Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd | CPhI Online



























Register
Please register so we can remember your preferences, like your favourite suppliers and preferred news & events.


Name



E-mail address



Password



Retype password



Sign in






Supplier Login


User Name



Password



 Remember me
Sign in



New user? Register as a supplier

Forgot password?




Send Password







My Account

My Profile
Logout





















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































                2-8-4, Uchikanda • Chiyoda-ku • 101-0047 • Tokyo • Japan
            
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd






Home  ›  Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd  ›  Guanythiourea    
Product: Guanythiourea


                Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thioamides, thiourea which includes guanythiourea. Contact us for more information.
            


Go to company page 


About Guanythiourea



Sales Markets
Asia
Origin
Japan
Selling Points
Experienced Technicians
Reputation








Contact us for more information






Policy
      UBM (UK) Ltd may from time to time send updates about this product and other relevant UBM products and services. Your email will not be given to 3rd parties. By providing your email address you consent to being contacted by email for direct marketing purposes by UBM (UK) Ltd.
   


Send request



JavaScript is not enabled in your browser. Please enable JavaScript, or certain functions may not work properly.

Show more






More products by Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd





1-(3-dimethylaminopropyl)-3-ethyl-carbodiimide
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of carbodiimides which includes 1-(3-dimethylaminopropyl)-3-ethyl-carbodiimide. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






1-phenyl-2-mercaptobenzimidazole
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 1-phenyl-2-mercaptobenzimidazole. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






1,1-cyclopropanedicarboxylic acid
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of intermediates which includes 1,1-cyclopropanedicarboxylic acid. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






1,3-diisopropylcarbodiimide
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of carbodiimides which includes 1,3-diisopropylcarbodiimide. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






1,3,5-triacryloylhydro-s-triazine
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of triazines which includes 1,3,5-triacryloylhydro-s-triazine. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






1,4-dibutoxybenzene
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 1,4-dibutoxybenzene. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






1,4-diethoxy benzene
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 1,4-diethoxy benzene. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






1,4-diisoprpoxybenzene
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 1,4-diisoprpoxybenzene. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






1,4-dimethoxybenzene
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 1,4-dimethoxybenzene. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-acetyl phenothiazine
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-acetyl phenothiazine. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-amino-4-chlorobenzonitrile
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of intermediates which includes 2-amino-4-chlorobenzonitrile. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-amino-4-trifluromethylbenzenethiol
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes 2-amino-4-trifluromethylbenzenethiol. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-amino-5-nitrothiobenzamide
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thioamides, thiourea which includes 2-amino-5-nitrothiobenzamide. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-amino-6-methylbanzothiazole
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes 2-amino-6-methylbanzothiazole. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-aminobenzenthiol
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes 2-aminobenzenthiol. Contact us for more information.
Read more 








2-aminobenzothiazole
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes 2-aminobenzothiazole. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-anilino-4,6-dimercapto-s-triazine
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of triazines which includes 2-anilino-4,6-dimercapto-s-triazine. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-azaphenothiazine
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-azaphenothiazine. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-bromobenzidazole
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 2-bromobenzidazole. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-chloro phenothiazine
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-chloro phenothiazine. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-chloro-4,6-dimethoxy-1,3,5-triazine
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of triazines which includes 2-chloro-4,6-dimethoxy-1,3,5-triazine. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-chlorobenzothiazole
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes 2-chlorobenzothiazole. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-chlorophenyl isothiocyanate
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes 2-chlorophenyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-cyano phenothiazine
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-cyano phenothiazine. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-di-n-butylamino-4,6-dimercapto-s-triazine
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of triazines which includes 2-di-n-butylamino-4,6-dimercapto-s-triazine. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-dimethylaminosulfanyl phenothiazine
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-dimethylaminosulfanyl phenothiazine. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-flurophenyl isothiocyanate
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes 2-flurophenyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-hydroxybenzimidazole
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 2-hydroxybenzimidazole. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-mercapto pyrimidine
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of pyrimides which includes 2-mercapto pyrimidine. Contact us for more information.
Read more 






2-mercapto-5-benzimidazole sulfonic acid sodium salt
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 2-mercapto-5-benzimidazole sulfonic acid sodium salt. Contact us for more information.
Read more 



Browse all products 




Are you a supplier? Here's what we can do for you

Generate quality leads for your business
Stay visible for 365 days of the year
Receive product inquiries and respond to meeting requests directly
Improve company online presence through Search Engine Optimisation

Register now









Supplier Alert! Email me when Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd launches new products:


 (Policy>
      UBM (UK) Ltd may from time to time send updates about this product and other relevant UBM products and services. Your email will not be given to 3rd parties. By providing your email address you consent to being contacted by email for direct marketing purposes by UBM (UK) Ltd.
  )
			































KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL CO., LTD.



















JAPANESE


































































Recently, the map of world chemical industry has been rapidly expanded
                      with new industrialized nations and variable in both volumes and technologies.

                      We should be more strategic and competitive to cope with those changes; our company has always kept in mind about synergy of unification of manufacturing and trading since the establishment in 1947.

                      The piles of technologies in the plant sites and sales in the market have
                      been combined to strengthen our business activities. The majority of 200
                      workforces of our company belong to plant sites and R&D center was
                      reorganized at Urawa in 2007 for more effective research and quick response
                      to our customers. I think the progressing technology is not achieved in
                      short time but indispensable to dedicate to our company’s reputation.

                      We are mainly manufacturing peroxides in both Shizuoka and Jakarta, and
                      fine chemical intermediates on contract bases.

                      Our company is conscious of environmental preservation and aiming the company that can contribute not only to a chemical industry but also to the society.






Chairman of the Board of Director
 




Kazuo Kitamura　
































Home ｜ About Us ｜ Business ｜ Product ｜ Facility/Technology ｜ Investor relations ｜ Contact Us






















Site map｜ Privacy policy
© Kawaguchi Chemical Co., Ltd.
designed by Seimi Co., Ltd.




















Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd.








Welcome to Guidechem,Sign In or Join free now ?

 Home
DisplayProduct
PostBuying
Help
 







Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd.






Home
Products
Company Profile
Certificate
Contacts











 Home>Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd. 






       Profile: Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd. manufactures fine-chemicals. Our product range comprises of organic rubber chemicals, polymer additives, photo-chemicals and pharmaceutical intermediates. We produce isothiocyanates, mercaptanes, thiazoles, imidazoles, pyrimidines, phenols & hydroquinone. We are an ISO 14001 and ISO 9001 certified company. Our corrosion inhibitors prevents the corrosion of metals like silver, bronze by forming a clear insoluable film on the surface.  



Productsmore>>





4,4'-Dithiodimorph (103-34-4)


Price: 
Purity:
Appearance:
Brand Name:




Chloranil (118-75-2)


Price: 
Purity:
Appearance:
Brand Name:










Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd.


Levels:Free member 
        Type:  
        Last Login:2010-11-12






            
            
            Tel:+81-(3)-3254 8481
            Fax:+81-(3)-3254 8497
            
            Address:Yamada bldg,. 8-4, Uchikanda2-chome, Chiyodaku, Tokyo, 
            








Chemicals:
        
        A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9

        Guidechem.com provides SiteMap | 
        About Us | 
        Service | 
        Payment | 
        Contact Guidechem | 
        Feedback | 
        Hot Products










Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback
















kawaguchi chemical industry co ltd
Public Company









Company Profile
Sector: Materials
Industry: Chemicals
Sub-Industry: Basic & Diversified Chemicals
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co., Ltd. manufactures and sells rubber chemicals. The Company's products include resins and intermediates.




Corporate Information
Address:

2-8-4 Uchikanda
Chiyoda-Ku, 101-0047
Japan


Phone:
81-48-222-5171


Fax:
81-3-3254-8497


Web url:
www.kawachem.co.jp/top/index-eng.htm





Board Members




President
Company


Yoshitaka Yamada
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd








Managing Director
Company


Hideyuki Yamada
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd


Mikio Ogino
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd








Director
Company


Kazutoshi Nakanishi
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd


Takashi Kayano
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd


Akimori Kamata
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd








Board Members
Company




Kazuya Nakamura
Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd


























From The Web











Key Executives


Yoshitaka Yamada


President




Hideyuki Yamada


Managing Director




Mikio Ogino


Managing Director




Takashi Kayano


Director




Akimori Kamata


Director




Kazutoshi Nakanishi


Director







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data











































About Us | KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL




















 JAPANESE







































Home > About Us >　Company Profile　|　KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL Group　|　Offices & Affiliates




















Company Name
KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL CO., LTD.


Head Office
No.9-2, Nihonbashi Honcho 3-chome
                        Chuo-ku, Tokyo 103-0023, Japan
Google map
TEL　81-3-3662-7171
FAX　81-3-3639-9100


Offices
Osaka, Nagoya, Fukuoka


Plants
Tokyo, Saitama, Ibaraki, Shizuoka,
                        Yamagata, Indonesia


Foundation
April, 1947


Capital
JPYen 36,000,000

                        JPYen 313,000,000 
(Sum of KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL Group)









Board of Directors







Chairman of the Board of Director
Kazuo Kitamura



President & CEO
Akira Ogiso



Director
Masataka Baba



Director
Junichi Miyakawa



Director
Sumio Suga



Corporate Auditor
Shin Tokunaga







































Sales Department






KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL CO., LTD. Head Office
                  No. 9-2, Nihonbashi-Honcho 3-chome , Chuo-ku, Tokyo 103-0023, Japan
Google map
                  TEL:81-3-3662-7171　FAX:81-3-3639-9100

KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL CO., LTD. (trading company)
                  No. 9-2, Nihonbashi-Honcho 3-chome , Chuo-ku, Tokyo 103-0023, Japan
Google map
TEL:81-3-3662-5948　FAX:81-3-3662-7170






KANSAI BRANCH
                  Furukawa Hamadori West Bldg. 3F, 1-8, Dojimahama 2-chome, Kita-ku, Osaka
                  530-0004, Japan
TEL:81-6-6341-3451  FAX:81-6-6341-3211

NAGOYA OFFICE
                  Nishiki Hotei Bldg. 3F, 5-21, Nishiki 3-chome, Naka-ku, Nagoya 460-0003,
                  Japan
                  TEL:81-52-253-9155 FAX:81-52-951-1811

FUKUOKA OFFICE
                  Daini Onishi Bldg. 3F, 11-16, Hakataekimae 2-chome, Hakata-ku, Fukuoka
                  812-0011, Japan
                  TEL:81-92-473-7625 FAX:81-92-473-7626









Manufacturing Department






SHIZUOKA KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL CO., LTD.
                  1456, Ohbuchi Maehama, Kakegawa 437-1302, Japan
TEL:81-537-48-2492　FAX:81-537-48-5394


ORGANIC KAWAGUCHI CO., LTD.1-1, Hachimanpara1-chome, Yonezawa 992-1128, Japan
TEL:81-238-28-0029  FAX:81-6-238-28-0033




SANKO PAINT CO., LTD.6-8, Higashisakashita 2-chome, Itabashi-ku, Tokyo 174-0042, Japan
TEL:81-3-3966-2761  FAX:81-3-3965-6217


IBARAKI KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL CO., LTD.
                  16-1, Kashiwabara, Ishioka, Ibaraki 315-0002, Japan
TEL:81-299-23-6181  FAX:81-299-24-1401




ITABASHI CHEMICAL CO., LTD.25-8, Shibiraki 1-chome, sakura-ku, Saitama 338-0834, Japan
TEL:81-48-862-5711  FAX:81-48-862-5714


KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL CO., LTD. FUNADO warehouse20-29, Funado 3-chome, Itabashi-ku, Tokyo 174-0041, Japan
                  TEL:81-3-3966-7391 FAX:81-3-3965-0754









R&D Department






KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL CO., LTD. R&D CENTER25-8, Shibiraki 1-chome, sakura-ku, Saitama 338-0834, Japan
                  TEL:81-48-862-5712 FAX:81-48-862-5751










Overseas Joint venture






P.T. KAWAGUCHI KIMIA INDONESIA
                  H.Q. : JI.S Parman Kav 12 Lt.10 No.1009 Jakarta Barat 11480
                  TEL: (62-21)530 5901　　FAX:(62-21)530 5908

Factory : Jl.Raya Serang Km. 12.5 Desa Bitung Jaya. Cikupa , Tangerang-Jawa Barat 15710
                  TEL: (62-21)596 1789　　FAX:(62-21)596 1139









IT System Department






SEIMI CO., LTD.
                  12-13, Nihonbashi-Honcho 4-chome,Chuo-ku, Tokyo 103-0023, Japan
                  TEL:81-3-5614-0845　FAX:81-3-5614-0846





































Home ｜ About Us ｜ Business ｜ Product ｜ Facility/Technology ｜ Investor relations ｜ Contact Us























Site map ｜ Privacy policy
© Kawaguchi Chemical Co., Ltd.
designed by Seimi Co., Ltd.

















  4361:Tokyo Stock Quote - Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co Ltd   4361:JP   Tokyo        215.0JPY   1.0   0.47%     As of 2:00 AM EDT 8/3/2017     Open   216.0    Day Range   214.0 - 220.0    Volume   77,000    Previous Close   214.0    52Wk Range   101.0 - 287.0    1 Yr Return   91.96%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   216.0    Day Range   214.0 - 220.0    Volume   77,000    Previous Close   214.0    52Wk Range   101.0 - 287.0    1 Yr Return   91.96%    YTD Return   69.29%    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   10.19    Earnings per Share (JPY) (TTM)   21.1    Market Cap (b JPY)   2.623    Shares Outstanding  (m)   12.200    Price/Sales (TTM)   0.38    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   1.40%        Sector Materials   % Price Change -0.30%     Industry Materials   % Price Change -0.30%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co., Ltd. manufactures and sells rubber chemicals. The Company's products include resins and intermediates.    Address  2-8-4 UchikandaChiyoda-Ku, 101-0047Japan   Phone  81-48-222-5171   Website   www.kawachem.co.jp/top/index-eng.htm     Executives Board Members    Yoshitaka Yamada  President    Hideyuki Yamada  Managing Director    Mikio Ogino  Managing Director    Takashi Kayano  Director    Akimori Kamata  Director     Show More         


























Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co., Ltd. | CPHI - JAPAN







 






































Skip to main content










 










  



            Mix with the world of pharma products, people & solutions          

            18 - 20 April 2018          

            Big Sight Exhibition Centre - East Hall 1, 2 and 3 | Tokyo, Japan          


Book a stand
Register as visitor
日本語ページへ
 













You are hereHome  / Japan / Exhibitors / Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co., Ltd. 













            Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co., Ltd.          









Share on Facebook
Share on Google Plus
Share on LinkedIn
Share on Twitter
 
















 


	We, KAWAGUCHI CHEMICAL INDUSTRY, focus on not only the pharmaceutical intermediate but also the field of functional chemical product such as the first growing electronic materials market. We have several multi-purpose plants which adjusted developing various needs. The plants have the low temperature reactor to -80 degree centigrade. In addition, our analytical instruments, ICP-AES, TOF-MS, are possible to analyze the fine chemicals. We have been selling tons scale of main product, EDC, DIC, These products have been used by many pharmaceutical companies in the world.
Exhibitor categoriesIntermediatesMore information 




Contact details2-8-4, UchikandaChiyoda-ku101-0047TokyoJapanwww.kawachem.co.jp 


Products








 

2,4,6-triallyoxy-s-triazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of triazines which includes 2,4,6-triallyoxy-s-triazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-anilino-4,6-dimercapto-s-triazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of triazines which includes 2-anilino-4,6-dimercapto-s-triazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-di-n-butylamino-4,6-dimercapto-s-triazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of triazines which includes 2-di-n-butylamino-4,6-dimercapto-s-triazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2,4,6-trimercapto-s-triazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of triazines which includes 2,4,6-trimercapto-s-triazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-azaphenothiazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-azaphenothiazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-dimethylaminosulfanyl phenothiazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-dimethylaminosulfanyl phenothiazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-methylthio phenothiazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-methylthio phenothiazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-trifluromethyl phenothiazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-trifluromethyl phenothiazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-acetyl phenothiazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-acetyl phenothiazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-cyano phenothiazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-cyano phenothiazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-chloro phenothiazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-chloro phenothiazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-methoxy phenothiazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes 2-methoxy phenothiazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

Phenothiazine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenothiazines which includes phenothiazine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2,5-di-amyl-1,4-dibutoxybenzene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 2,5-di-amyl-1,4-dibutoxybenzene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2,5-di-tert-amylhydroquinone 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 2,5-di-tert-amylhydroquinone. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2,5-di-tert-butoxybenezene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 2,5-di-tert-butoxybenezene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2,5-di-tert-butylhydroquinone 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 2,5-di-tert-butylhydroquinone. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

3,5-dihydroxybenzoic acid 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 3,5-dihydroxybenzoic acid. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

3-ethoxyphenol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 3-ethoxyphenol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

3-methoxyphenol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 3-methoxyphenol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2,5-dibutoxy chlorobenzene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 2,5-dibutoxy chlorobenzene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

1,4-dibutoxybenzene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 1,4-dibutoxybenzene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

4-butoxyphenol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 4-butoxyphenol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

1,4-diisoprpoxybenzene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 1,4-diisoprpoxybenzene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

4-isopropoxyphenol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 4-isopropoxyphenol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2,5-diethoxy chlorobenzene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 2,5-diethoxy chlorobenzene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

1,4-diethoxy benzene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 1,4-diethoxy benzene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

4-ethoxyphenol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 4-ethoxyphenol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2,5-dimethoxy aniline 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 2,5-dimethoxy aniline. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2,5-dichlorohydroquinone dimethyl 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 2,5-dichlorohydroquinone dimethyl. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

1,4-dimethoxybenzene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 1,4-dimethoxybenzene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

4-methoxyphenol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of phenols which includes 4-methoxyphenol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

4-hydroxy2-mercapto 6-methyl pyrimidine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of pyrimides which includes 4-hydroxy2-mercapto 6-methyl pyrimidine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-mercapto pyrimidine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of pyrimides which includes 2-mercapto pyrimidine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

4,6-dimethoxy-2-methylsulfonicpyrimidine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of pyrimides which includes 4,6-dimethoxy-2-methylsulfonicpyrimidine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

4,6-dimethoxy-2-aminopyrimide 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of pyrimides which includes 4,6-dimethoxy-2-aminopyrimide. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

4,6-bis(difluromethoxy)2-methylthiopyrimidine 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of pyrimides which includes 4,6-bis(difluromethoxy)2-methylthiopyrimidine. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-thiobarbituric acid 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of pyrimides which includes 2-thiobarbituric acid. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-methylthiobarbituric acid 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of pyrimides which includes 2-methylthiobarbituric acid. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-mercapto-5-benzimidazole sulfonic acid sodium salt 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 2-mercapto-5-benzimidazole sulfonic acid sodium salt. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-bromobenzidazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 2-bromobenzidazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-hydroxybenzimidazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 2-hydroxybenzimidazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

1-phenyl-2-mercaptobenzimidazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 1-phenyl-2-mercaptobenzimidazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-mercapto-5-carboxylbenzimidazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 2-mercapto-5-carboxylbenzimidazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-mercapto-5-methoxybenzimidazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 2-mercapto-5-methoxybenzimidazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-mercaptobenzimidazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of imidazoles which includes 2-mercaptobenzimidazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-amino-6-methylbanzothiazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes 2-amino-6-methylbanzothiazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-aminobenzothiazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes 2-aminobenzothiazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-methyl-4,57-triflurobenzothiazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes 2-methyl-4,57-triflurobenzothiazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-chlorobenzothiazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes 2-chlorobenzothiazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-methylbenzothiazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes 2-methylbenzothiazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-mercaptothiozoline 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes 2-mercaptothiozoline. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-methylthiobenzothiazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes 2-methylthiobenzothiazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

M2-mercapobenzothiazole 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of thiazoles which includes M2-Mercapobenzothiazole. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

Bis(3,5dichlorophenyl) disulfide 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes bis(3,5dichlorophenyl) disulfide. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

3,5-dichlorobenzenethiol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes 3,5-dichlorobenzenethiol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

Thionicotin acid 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes thionicotin acid. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

Benzyl mercaptan 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes benzyl mercaptan. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-amino-4-trifluromethylbenzenethiol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes 2-amino-4-trifluromethylbenzenethiol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2, 4-diflurobenzenethiol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes 2, 4-diflurobenzenethiol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

4-flurobenzenthiol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes 4-flurobenzenthiol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

4-aminobenzenthiol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes 4-aminobenzenthiol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-aminobenzenthiol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of mercaptanes which includes 2-aminobenzenthiol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

Bunics n-butyl isothiocyanate 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes bunics n-butyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

Benzyl isothiocyanate 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes benzyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

Cyclohexyl isothiocyanate 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes cyclohexyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

3-acetylaminophenyl isothiocyanate 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes 3-acetylaminophenyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2, 3, 4-triflurophenyl isothiocyanate 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes 2, 3, 4-triflurophenyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

Df-ncs 3,4-diflurophenyl isothiocyanate 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes df-ncs 3,4-diflurophenyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-flurophenyl isothiocyanate 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes 2-flurophenyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-methylphenyl isothiocyanate 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes 2-methylphenyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2-chlorophenyl isothiocyanate 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes 2-chlorophenyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

Phenyl isothiocyanate 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of isothiocyanates which includes phenyl isothiocyanate. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

Tri-benzyl phenol 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of intermediates which includes tri-benzyl phenol. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

P-diethoxy benzene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of intermediates which includes p-diethoxy benzene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

P-dimethoxy benzene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of intermediates which includes p-dimethoxy benzene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 





 

2,5-dimethoxy chlorobenzene 



                      Kawaguchi Chemical Industry Co. Ltd offers wide range of intermediates which includes 2,5-dimethoxy chlorobenzene. Contact us for more information                    

More details 








 



Back to exhibitorlist
 














 







 















